Illinois, session 104th, SB744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2211)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Child Care Act of 1969.9(Source: P.A. 76-63.)